Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

SUBTITLE C. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 332. MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY RECREATIONAL PROGRAMS AND FACILITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY AUTHORITY

Sec. 332.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Governing body" means a governing body of a municipality or commissioners court of a county, or another body acting in place of the municipal governing body or commissioners court.

(2) "Board" means a board, commission, committee, or council appointed or designated to carry out this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 332.002. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF RECREATIONAL FACILITIES AND PROGRAMS. A municipality or county may establish, provide, acquire, maintain, construct, equip, operate, and supervise recreational facilities and programs, either singly or jointly in cooperation with one or more other municipalities or counties.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 332.003. REFERENDUM. A municipality or county may submit in an election of its qualified voters the question of whether it should exercise the powers conferred by this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 332.004. FINANCES. (a) A municipality or county may pay costs and expenses of carrying out this subchapter from its general revenues or from other revenues provided by law for the establishment or the operation of parks and recreational facilities.

(b) Municipalities and counties jointly exercising the powers by this subchapter may agree on the manner and method of division of costs and expenses.

(c) Renumbered as V.T.C.A. Local Government Code, Sec. 445.022 by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 8.02, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 807, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 8.02, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 332.005. ADMINISTRATION. A governing body may administer and operate recreational facilities and programs through a bureau or department of recreation or through a board established jointly with another governing body. The board shall adopt rules for the administration and operation of the recreational facilities and programs under its control subject to the approval of the establishing governing bodies.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 332.006. GRANTS. A municipality or county may accept a grant, a lease, a loan or devise of real estate, a gift or bequest of money, either principal or income, or any other personal property for temporary or permanent use for the establishment, operation, or support of public recreation facilities and programs.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER B. JOINT FACILITIES FOR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

Sec. 332.021. JOINT RECREATIONAL FACILITIES. (a) Any two political subdivisions, including municipalities and independent school districts, that are located in the same or adjacent counties may jointly by agreement establish, provide, maintain, construct, and operate playgrounds, recreation centers, athletic fields, swimming pools, and other park or recreational facilities located on property owned or acquired by either political subdivision.

(b) The political subdivisions acting jointly may issue bonds and otherwise act under either Subchapter A, Chapter 1504, Government Code, or Subchapter C, Chapter 1508, Government Code, for the purposes authorized by this section. The political subdivisions may issue the bonds and take other joint actions under their agreement by joint concurrent ordinances or resolutions.

(c) The political subdivisions may delegate supervision and management of the facilities to an operating board or agency.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.325, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.